test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_tahhee_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tahhee: # taken from affixes
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Nom: tahhee
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Gen: tahhee
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Acc: tahhee
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Ill: tahhei 
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Loc: tahhest 
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Com: tahhein
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Sg+Abe: tahheettáá
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Ess: tahhen
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Par: tahhed
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Nom: tahheeh
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Gen: tahhei
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Acc: tahheid
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Ill: tahheid
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Loc: tahhein
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Com: [tahheiguin, tahheigijn]
    tahhee+N+NomAg+Pl+Abe: tahheittáá

  Noun - vyeijee: # 
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Nom: vyeijee
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Gen: vyeijee
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Acc: vyeijee
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Ill: vyeijei           
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Loc: vyeijest 
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Com: vyeijein
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Abe: vyeijeettáá
    vyeijee+N+Ess: vyeijen
    vyeijee+N+Par: vyeijed
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Nom: vyeijeeh
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Gen: vyeijei
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Acc: vyeijeid
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Ill: vyeijeid
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Loc: vyeijein
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Com: [vyeijeiguin, vyeijeigijn]
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Abe: vyeijeittáá
    
  Noun - čuárvoo: # 
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Nom: čuárvoo
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Gen: čuárvoo
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Acc: čuárvoo
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Ill: čuárvoi 
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Loc: čuárvost 
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Com: čuárvoin
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Abe: čuárvoottáá
    čuárvoo+N+Ess: čuárvon
    čuárvoo+N+Par: čuárvod
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Nom: čuárvooh
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Gen: čuárvoi
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Acc: čuárvoid
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Ill: čuárvoid
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Loc: čuárvoin
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Com: [čuárvoiguin, čuárvoigijn]
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Abe: čuárvoittáá

  Noun - orroo: # 
    orroo+N+Sg+Nom: orroo
    orroo+N+Sg+Gen: orroo
    orroo+N+Sg+Acc: orroo
    orroo+N+Sg+Ill: orroi 
    orroo+N+Sg+Loc: orrost 
    orroo+N+Sg+Com: orroin
    orroo+N+Sg+Abe: orroottáá
    orroo+N+Ess: orron
    orroo+N+Par: orrod
    orroo+N+Pl+Nom: orrooh
    orroo+N+Pl+Gen: orroi
    orroo+N+Pl+Acc: orroid
    orroo+N+Pl+Ill: orroid
    orroo+N+Pl+Loc: orroin
    orroo+N+Pl+Com: [orroiguin, orroigijn]
    orroo+N+Pl+Abe: orroittáá
